District of Columbia statutes.
25-726

Control of litter.

(a)

The licensee under a retailer’s license shall take reasonable measures to ensure that the immediate environs of the establishment, including adjacent alleys, sidewalks, or other public property immediately adjacent to the establishment, or other property used by the licensee to conduct its business, are kept free of litter.

(b)

The licensee under a retailer’s license shall comply with the Litter Control Expansion Amendment Act of 1987, effective October 9, 1987 (D.C. Law 7-38; 23 DCMR § 720).

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
This section is referenced in § 25-313.